Mississippi, session 2026, HB883.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the State Department of Mental Health for the purpose of expanding outpatient services and community-based services for former inmates of the Department of Corrections who were diagnosed with a mental illness while housed within a state correctional institution of the Department of Corrections and who are no longer incarcerated within a correctional institution of the Department of Corrections, as provided in House Bill No.    , 2026 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027...... ................................................. $ 1,000,000.00 SECTION 2.  The Department of Mental Health shall distribute up to $500,000.00 of the money appropriated in Section 1 of this act among the community mental health centers to be used for the same purpose described in Section 1, as provided in House Bill No.____, 2026 Regular Session. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.